FST/kin.lexc
!!! kin.lexc - Lexicon File for 'Mudasobwa' Kinyarwanda Transducer !!!

Multichar_Symbols
	+CL1 +CL1or3 +CL2 +CL3 +CL4 +CL5 +CL6 +CL7 +CL8 +CL9or10 +CL9 CL1%0 +CL11 +CL12 +CL13 +CL14 +CL15 +CL16 +BEN +INSTorCAUS +RECIP +PASS +IMP +PERF +LOC +INF +NOT.YET +RMT.PAST +RCT.PAST +PRES +FUT +ALSO +STILL +NEG +REFL +UNK1 +UNK2 +UNK3 +UNK4 +UNK6 +UNK7 +UNK8 +UNK +IMPER CL1or3.of CL2.of CL4or6or9.of CL5.of CL7.of CL8.of CL1%0.of CL11.of CL12.of CL13.of CL14.of CL15.of CL16.of CL1or3.for CL2.for CL4or6or9.for CL5.for CL7.for CL8.for CL1%0.for CL11.for CL12or15.for CL13.for CL14.for CL16.for CL1or3.DIST CL2.DIST CL4.DIST CL5.DIST CL6.DIST CL7.DIST CL8.DIST CL9.DIST CL1%0.DIST CL11.DIST CL12.DIST CL13.DIST CL14.DIST CL15.DIST CL16.DIST CL4or9-those.of CL8-those.of CL1or3.PROX CL4or9.PROX CL2.PROX CL5.PROX CL6.PROX CL7.PROX CL8.PROX CL9.PROX CL1%0.PROX CL11.PROX CL12.PROX CL13.PROX CL14.PROX CL15.PROX CL16.PROX CL1or3.DIST2 CL2.DIST2 CL7.DIST2 CL8.DIST2 CL14.DIST2 CL15.DIST2 CL15.IMMED COP COP.LOC INF.COP

LEXICON Root
 
Noun;
Adjective;
Verb;
AdverbHelper;
FunctionHelper;
Numeral;
Symbol;
UnparsedHelper;

LEXICON Numeral

+:0	Numerals;

LEXICON Numerals

%0	Numerals;
1	Numerals;
2	Numerals;
3	Numerals;
4	Numerals;
5	Numerals;
6	Numerals;
7	Numerals;
8	Numerals;
9	Numerals;
+NUM:0	#;

LEXICON Symbol

+:0	Symbols;

LEXICON Symbols

%'	Symbols;
%.	Symbols;
%?	Symbols;
%!	Symbols;
%,	Symbols;
%@	Symbols;
%;	Symbols;
%/	Symbols;
%:	Symbols;
%(	Symbols;
%)	Symbols;
%«	Symbols;
%»	Symbols;
%œ	Symbols;
%"	Symbols;
%'	Symbols;
%;	Symbols;
%-	Symbols;
+PUNC:0	#;
 
LEXICON Noun

+N+CL1or3:umu^  NounRootHelper;
+N+CL1or3:mu^	  NounRootHelper;
+N+CL2:aba^  NounRootHelper;
+N+CL2:ba^   NounRootHelper;
+N+CL4:imi^  NounRootHelper;
+N+CL4:mi^   NounRootHelper;
+N+CL5:i^    NounRootHelper;
+N+CL6:ama^  NounRootHelper;
+N+CL6:ma^   NounRootHelper;
+N+CL6:am^   NounRootHelper;
+N+CL7:iki^  NounRootHelper;
+N+CL7:igi^  NounRootHelper;
+N+CL7:ki^   NounRootHelper;
+N+CL7:gi^   NounRootHelper;
+N+CL7:icy^  NounRootHelper;
+N+CL8:ibi^  NounRootHelper;
+N+CL8:bi^   NounRootHelper;
+N+CL9:in^   NounRootHelper;
+N+CL9:n^	   NounRootHelper;
+N+CL9:m^	   NounRootHelper;
+N+CL9:im^   NounRootHelper;
+N+CL1%0:uru^ NounRootHelper;
+N+CL1%0:ru^ NounRootHelper;
+N+CL12:aka^ NounRootHelper;
+N+CL12:aga^ NounRootHelper;
+N+CL13:utu^ NounRootHelper;
+N+CL14:ubu^ NounRootHelper;
+N+CL14:bu^ NounRootHelper;
+N+CL15:uku^ NounRootHelper;
+N+CL16:aha^ NounRootHelper;
+N+CL16:ha^ NounRootHelper;
+N:0	ProperNounHelper;
+PN:0	PronounHelper;
LoanHelper;
OtherHelper;

LEXICON Adjective

+ADJ+1SG:n^		AdjStemHelper;
+ADJ+1PL:tu^	AdjStemHelper;
+ADJ+1PL:tw^	AdjStemHelper;
+ADJ+2SG:u^		AdjStemHelper;
+ADJ+2SG:w^		AdjStemHelper;
+ADJ+2PL:mu^	AdjStemHelper;
+ADJ+CL1:a^		AdjStemHelper;
+ADJ+CL1:y^		AdjStemHelper;
+ADJ+CL2:ba^	AdjStemHelper;
+ADJ+CL2:b^	AdjStemHelper;
+ADJ+CL4:mi^	AdjStemHelper;
+ADJ+CL5:ri^	AdjStemHelper;
+ADJ+CL7:ci^	AdjStemHelper;
+ADJ+CL7:ki^	AdjStemHelper;
+ADJ+CL7:gi^	AdjStemHelper;
+ADJ+CL8:bi^	AdjStemHelper;
+ADJ+CL9or1%0:i^		AdjStemHelper;
+ADJ+CL9or1%0:e^		AdjStemHelper;
+ADJ+CL14:bu^	AdjStemHelper;
+ADJ+CL16:ha^	AdjStemHelper;
+ADJ+UNK1:zi^	AdjStemHelper;
+ADJ+UNK2:za^	AdjStemHelper;
+ADJ+UNK3:ru^	AdjStemHelper;
+ADJ+UNK4:yi^	AdjStemHelper;
+ADJ+UNK6:ma^	AdjStemHelper;
+ADJ+UNK7:mpa^	AdjStemHelper;
+ADJ+UNK8:ni^	AdjStemHelper;
+ADJ+IMPER:du^	AdjStemHelper;
+ADJ+INF:ku^	AdjStemHelper;
+ADJ+INF:gu^	AdjStemHelper;
+ADJ+INF:kw^	AdjStemHelper;
+ADJ:0		AdjStemHelper;

LEXICON Verb

+NEG+V:nti	VerbSubjComp;
+NEG+V:nt	VerbSubjComp;
+NEG+V:si	VerbSubjComp;
+V:0		VerbSubjComp;
+V:0		Copula;

LEXICON Copula

+ni:ni		#;
+niho:niho		#;
+kuri:kuri		#;
+hari:hari		#;
+kuba:kuba		#;
+NEG:nti	CopSubjComp;
+NEG:nt		CopSubjComp;
+NEG:si		CopSubjComp;
CopSubjComp;

LEXICON CopSubjComp

+1SG:n^		CopPostSubj;
+1PL:tu^	CopPostSubj;
+2SG:u^		CopPostSubj;
+2PL:mu^	CopPostSubj;
+CL1:a^		CopPostSubj;
+CL2:ba^	CopPostSubj;
+CL4:mi^	CopPostSubj;
+CL5:ri^	CopPostSubj;
+CL7:ci^	CopPostSubj;  ! ki?
+CL8:bi^	CopPostSubj;
+CL9:i^		CopPostSubj;
+CL1%0:i^	CopPostSubj;
+CL14:bu^	CopPostSubj;
+CL16:ha^	CopPostSubj;
+UNK1:zi^	CopPostSubj;
+UNK2:za^	CopPostSubj;
+UNK3:ru^	CopPostSubj;
+UNK4:yi^	CopPostSubj;
+UNK6:ma^	CopPostSubj;
+UNK7:mpa^	CopPostSubj;
+UNK8:ni^	CopPostSubj;
+IMPER:du^	CopPostSubj;
+INF:ku^	CopPostSubj;
+INF:gu^	CopPostSubj;
+INF:kw^	CopPostSubj;

LEXICON CopPostSubj

+STILL:racya^	CopRestricted;
CopRestricted;

LEXICON CopRestricted

+ari:ari		VerbLoc;
+ri:ri		VerbLoc;

LEXICON VerbSubjComp

+1SG:n^		VerbPostSubj;
+1PL:tu^	VerbPostSubj;
+1PL:tw^	VerbPostSubj;
+2SG:u^		VerbPostSubj;
+2SG:w^		VerbPostSubj;
+2PL:mu^	VerbPostSubj;
+CL1:a^		VerbPostSubj;
+CL1:y^		VerbPostSubj;
+CL2:ba^	VerbPostSubj;
+CL2:ab^	VerbPostSubj;
+CL2:b^		VerbPostSubj;
+CL4:mi^	VerbPostSubj;
+CL5:ri^	VerbPostSubj;
+CL7:ci^	VerbPostSubj;
+CL7:ki^	VerbPostSubj;
+CL7:gi^	VerbPostSubj;
+CL8:bi^	VerbPostSubj;
+CL9or1%0:i^		VerbPostSubj;
+CL9or1%0:e^		VerbPostSubj;
+CL14:bu^	VerbPostSubj;
+CL16:ha^	VerbPostSubj;
+UNK1:zi^	VerbPostSubj;
+UNK2:za^	VerbPostSubj;
+UNK3:ru^	VerbPostSubj;
+UNK4:yi^	VerbPostSubj;
+UNK6:ma^	VerbPostSubj;
+UNK7:mpa^	VerbPostSubj;
+UNK8:ni^	VerbPostSubj;
+IMPER:du^	VerbPostSubj;
+INF:ku^	VerbPostSubj;
+INF:gu^	VerbPostSubj;
+INF:kw^	VerbPostSubj;
VerbPostSubj;

LEXICON VerbPostSubj

+NOT.YET:ta^	VerbStill;
VerbStill;

LEXICON VerbStill

+STILL:racya^	VerbTense;
VerbTense;

LEXICON VerbTense

+RMT.PAST:da^	VerbAlso;
+RMT.PAST:ara^	VerbAlso;
+RMT.PAST:ta^	VerbAlso;
+RCT.PAST:a^	VerbAlso;
+PRES:ra^		VerbAlso;
+FUT:za^		VerbAlso;
VerbAlso;

LEXICON VerbAlso

+ALSO:na^	VerbObj;
VerbObj;

LEXICON VerbObj

+1SG:n^		VerbObj;
+1SG:ni^	VerbObj;
+1PL:ku^	VerbObj;
+1PL:tu^	VerbObj;
+1PL:du^	VerbObj;
+1PL:t^		VerbObj;
+2SG:mu^	VerbObj;
+2SG:mw^	VerbObj;
+2SG:um^	VerbObj;
+CL2:ba^	VerbObj;
+CL7:ki^	VerbObj;
+CL7:gi^	VerbObj;
+CL8:bi^	VerbObj;
+CL8:by^	VerbObj;
+CL8:byi^	VerbObj;
+CL12:ka^	VerbObj;
+CL14:bu^	VerbObj;
+UNK4:yi^	VerbObj;
+UNK5:cya^	VerbObj;
+UNK:ga^	VerbObj;
+UNK:gu^	VerbObj;
VerbRefl;

LEXICON VerbRefl

+REFL:i^	VerbStemHelper;
+REFL:yi^	VerbStemHelper;
VerbStemHelper;

LEXICON IrrVerbStem

ri		VerbLoc;
riri	VerbLoc;
hari	VerbLoc;
bizi	VerbLoc;
kiyiri	VerbLoc;
tazi	VerbLoc;
muzi	VerbLoc;
wari	VerbLoc;

LEXICON VerbStemHelper

+:0		VerbStem;

LEXICON VerbAppl

+BEN:^ir			VerbAppl;
+BEN:^er			VerbAppl;
+RECIP:^an			VerbAppl;
+INSTorCAUS:^esh	VerbAppl;
+INSTorCAUS:^ish	VerbAppl;
VerbPass;

LEXICON VerbPass

+PASS:^w	VerbFinal;
VerbFinal;

LEXICON VerbFinal

+IMP:^a		VerbLoc;
+PERF:^e	VerbLoc;
+PERF:^ye	VerbLoc;
+IMP:^aga	VerbLoc;

LEXICON VerbLoc

+LOC:^mo	#;
+LOC:^ho	#;
+LOC:^yo	#;
#;

LEXICON ProperNounHelper

+:0		ProperNoun;

LEXICON ProperNoun

uwimana% rishard	#;
uwimana% richard	#;
kigali	 		#;
nyarugenge		#;
nyakabanda		#;
habyarimana		#;
gitondo			#;
imana			#;
focas			#;
john			#;
bugesera		#;

LEXICON PronounHelper

+:0		Pronoun;

LEXICON Pronoun

njyewe		#;
njye		#;
nabo		#;
natwe		#;
bo		#;
tariki		#;
wowe		#;
we		#;
ukwe		#;
ukwabo		#;
niwe		#;
nabyo		#;
nako		#;
nakoze		#;
niko		#;
wenyine		#;
jyenyine	#;

LEXICON NounRootHelper

+:0		NounRoot;

LEXICON AdjStemHelper

+:0		AdjStem;

LEXICON LoanHelper

+:0		Loans;

LEXICON OtherHelper

+:0		Other;

LEXICON AdverbHelper

+ADV+:0		Adverb;

LEXICON FunctionHelper

+:0		Function;

LEXICON UnparsedHelper

+:0		Unparsed;

LEXICON VerbStem
zi		VerbLoc;
ti		VerbLoc;
vuts		VerbAppl;
vuki			VerbAppl;
baz		VerbAppl;
tang		VerbAppl;
v		VerbAppl;
hanur		VerbAppl;
maz		VerbAppl;
gani			VerbAppl;
tah		VerbAppl;
tinz				VerbAppl;
hit		VerbAppl;
hot				VerbAppl;
bwir		VerbAppl;
gez		VerbAppl;
duh		VerbAppl;
his		VerbAppl;
sohok		VerbAppl;
z		VerbAppl;
kingur		VerbAppl;
kome		VerbAppl;
gi		VerbAppl;
umiw		VerbAppl;
hish		VerbAppl;
mv		VerbAppl;
itw		VerbAppl;
bic		VerbAppl;
shak		VerbAppl;
kund		VerbAppl;
ba		VerbAppl;
jyan		VerbAppl;
rind		VerbAppl;
tureb		VerbAppl;
pfu		VerbAppl;
her		VerbAppl;
manuk		VerbAppl;
bes			VerbAppl;
tumy		VerbAppl;
pur		VerbAppl;
sanz		VerbAppl;
shuhuj			VerbAppl;
ba		VerbAppl;
tangiri		VerbAppl;
vug			VerbAppl;
genz		VerbAppl;
iburangir		VerbAppl;
vug		VerbAppl;
kanjy		VerbAppl;
komez		VerbAppl;
duha		VerbAppl;
turem		VerbAppl;
gomb		VerbAppl;
akor		VerbAppl;
igend		VerbAppl;
akorer		VerbAppl;
veg		VerbAppl;
mugor		VerbAppl;
hur		VerbAppl;
nyish		VerbAppl;
twifuriza		VerbAppl;
ikanant		VerbAppl;
bur		VerbAppl;
kiri		VerbAppl;
gendan		VerbAppl;
byakiri		VerbAppl;
ikanamfash		VerbAppl;
utorosh		VerbAppl;
renz		VerbAppl;
garuk		VerbAppl;
cy		VerbAppl;
kabyit		VerbAppl;
rwara		VerbAppl;
tsinz		VerbAppl;
subi		VerbAppl;
babar		VerbAppl;
ishyu		VerbAppl;
kurikij		VerbAppl;
tumy		VerbAppl;
shan		VerbAppl;
huz		VerbAppl;
boney		VerbAppl;
shanw		VerbAppl;
ririmb		VerbAppl;
som		VerbAppl;
hay		VerbAppl;
shyushy		VerbAppl;
reka		VerbAppl;
tanir		VerbAppl;
komang		VerbAppl;
tuganiriz		VerbAppl;
reb		VerbAppl;
taha		VerbAppl;
gahit		VerbAppl;
ang		VerbAppl;
hagez		VerbAppl;
ray		VerbAppl;
tey		VerbAppl;
torok		VerbAppl;
hungi		VerbAppl;
ruk		VerbAppl;
ran		VerbAppl;
yerek		VerbAppl;
hagarari		VerbAppl;
rongo		VerbAppl;
pish		VerbAppl;
shij		VerbAppl;
ntwa		VerbAppl;
kabash		VerbAppl;
orosh		VerbAppl;
kagend		VerbAppl;
tuvur		VerbAppl;
rangiy		VerbAppl;
ibasi		VerbAppl;
ras		VerbAppl;
hang		VerbAppl;
vaz		VerbAppl;
rago		VerbAppl;
norosh		VerbAppl;
shim		VerbAppl;
kene		VerbAppl;
itegur		VerbAppl;
tekerez		VerbAppl;
babaj		VerbAppl;
rangij		VerbAppl;
ig		VerbAppl;
gut		VerbAppl;
kek		VerbAppl;
bah		VerbAppl;
rubak		VerbAppl;
got		VerbAppl;
gahur		VerbAppl;
gater		VerbAppl;
gakomez		VerbAppl;
humur 		VerbAppl;
it 		VerbAppl;
kor		VerbAppl;
rer 		VerbAppl;
rir 		VerbAppl;
keney		VerbAppl;
gahind		VerbAppl;
h		VerbAppl;
gasang		VerbAppl;
cik		VerbAppl;
fat		VerbAppl;
eger		VerbAppl;
kicay		VerbAppl;
king		VerbAppl;
kabij		VerbAppl;
komok		VerbAppl;
witw		VerbAppl;
sigar		VerbAppl;
sigar		VerbAppl;
paguruk		VerbAppl;
ntsek		VerbAppl;
nsets		VerbAppl;
twar		VerbAppl;
shyira		VerbAppl;
pang		VerbAppl;
ish		VerbAppl;
rut		VerbAppl;
nsobanuriy		VerbAppl;
ganririy		VerbAppl;
gir		VerbAppl;
ongey		VerbAppl;
rush		VerbAppl;
rwan		VerbAppl;
twar		VerbAppl;
emerer		VerbAppl;
maz		VerbAppl;
kanikang		VerbAppl;
mbuk		VerbAppl;
ubambuk		VerbAppl;
herej		VerbAppl;
ikunz		VerbAppl;
inginga		VerbAppl;
nkurikir		VerbAppl;
ndekur		VerbAppl;
ngendekey		VerbAppl;
tiny		VerbAppl;
hamaz		VerbAppl;
nkurikir		VerbAppl;
oherej		VerbAppl;
shyiriy		VerbAppl;
kurikir		VerbAppl;
tagir		VerbAppl;
ndukany		VerbAppl;
c		VerbAppl;
rikang		VerbAppl;
hinduk		VerbAppl;
isongoy		VerbAppl;
tandukanye		VerbAppl;
kijij		VerbAppl;
babariy		VerbAppl;
usigar		VerbAppl;
isek		VerbAppl;
hinguk		VerbAppl;
tur		VerbAppl;
kampumuirz		VerbAppl;
hend		VerbAppl;
tak		VerbAppl;
sab		VerbAppl;
kur		VerbAppl;
sash		VerbAppl;
twicaz		VerbAppl;
ibuyerek		VerbAppl;
humuriz		VerbAppl;
rokok		VerbAppl;
shir		VerbAppl;
abiterekej		VerbAppl;
ras		VerbAppl;
hong		VerbAppl;
nuk		VerbAppl;
gusohoy		VerbAppl;
mwerek		VerbAppl;
pagarik		VerbAppl;
sobanurir		VerbAppl;
fuk		VerbAppl;
amus		VerbAppl;
umwic		VerbAppl;
sharij		VerbAppl;
hanukir		VerbAppl;
tegerej		VerbAppl;
gusabiy		VerbAppl;
tubyay		VerbAppl;
hamusang		VerbAppl;
mfashij		VerbAppl;
remer		VerbAppl;
inginz		VerbAppl;
uhagij		VerbAppl;
tashy		VerbAppl;
hingukiy		VerbAppl;
emerey		VerbAppl;
emer		VerbAppl;
nyinjij		VerbAppl;
nshyiz		VerbAppl;
subiz		VerbAppl;
uk		VerbAppl;
bajij		VerbAppl;
bohoz		VerbAppl;
rokora		VerbAppl;
umvis		VerbAppl;
pung		VerbAppl;
kurez		VerbAppl;
zibits		VerbAppl;
vandim		VerbAppl;
arerew		VerbAppl;
tugur		VerbAppl;
gusov		VerbAppl;
nyinuby		VerbAppl;
shyiz		VerbAppl;
vumw		VerbAppl;
bakuy		VerbAppl;
tung		VerbAppl;
siz		VerbAppl;
kiyung		VerbAppl;
girik		VerbAppl;
remy		VerbAppl;
kurwaz		VerbAppl;
taniy		VerbAppl;
wamp		VerbAppl;
rekur		VerbAppl;
kuriy		VerbAppl;
iriz		VerbAppl;
ririw		VerbAppl;
bujij		VerbAppl;
rot		VerbAppl;
bihorer		VerbAppl;
tarigez		VerbAppl;
iyemerer		VerbAppl;
gahah		VerbAppl;
waguh		VerbAppl;
yirih		VerbAppl;
sezerey		VerbAppl;
hemukiw		VerbAppl;
